Utah statutes.
58-68-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of osteopathic medicine on or for any person in Utah, as an osteopathic physician and surgeon, except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-68-305.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of osteopathic physician and surgeon.

